Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 13. WATER AND UTILITIES

SUBTITLE C. WATER PROVISIONS APPLYING TO MORE THAN ONE TYPE OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT

CHAPTER 573. AUTHORITY OF CERTAIN COUNTIES AND DISTRICTS TO REGULATE STORMWATER MANAGEMENT

Sec. 573.001. COUNTY OR DISTRICT SUBJECT TO CHAPTER. This chapter applies only to:

(1) a county with a population of 2.8 million or more;

(2) a district or authority created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, that:

(A) has boundaries coterminous with a county described by Subdivision (1); and

(B) is authorized to provide stormwater drainage and flood control facilities;

(3) a county with a population of more than 1.3 million for which the primary source of drinking water is an underground aquifer; or

(4) a county with a population of 800,000 or more that contains a portion of the Edwards Aquifer.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 245, Sec. 1, eff. May 28, 1999. Renumbered from Sec. 422.001 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(92), eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 195, Sec. 1, eff. June 2, 2003.

Renumbered from Local Government Code, Section 423.001 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 3.76(c)(3), eff. April 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 524 (S.B. 1299), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 573.002. GENERAL AUTHORITY. (a) A county, district, or authority may take any necessary or proper action to comply with the requirements of the stormwater permitting program under the national pollutant discharge elimination system (Section 402, Federal Water Pollution Control Act (33 U.S.C. Section 1342)), including:

(1) developing and implementing controls to reduce the discharge of pollutants from any conveyance or system of conveyance owned or operated by the county, district, or authority that is designed for collecting or conveying stormwater;

(2) developing, implementing, and enforcing stormwater management guidelines, design criteria, or rules to reduce the discharge of pollutants into any conveyance or system of conveyance owned or operated by the county, district, or authority that is designed for collecting or conveying stormwater;

(3) assisting residents with the proper management of used oil and toxic materials, including the holding of household hazardous waste collection events;

(4) developing and providing educational tools and activities designed to reduce or lead to the reduction of the discharge of pollutants into stormwater; and

(5) assessing reasonable charges to fund the implementation, administration, and operation of the stormwater permitting program as necessary to comply with federal or state program requirements.

(b) Notwithstanding Subsection (a)(5), a county, district, or authority may not assess a charge against property that is:

(1) exempt from ad valorem taxation; or

(2) subject to an assessment for the same purpose by another entity.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 245, Sec. 1, eff. May 28, 1999. Renumbered from Sec. 422.002 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(92), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 160 (S.B. 1932), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Renumbered from Local Government Code, Section 423.002 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 3.76(c)(3), eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 573.003. CIVIL PENALTY; INJUNCTION. (a) A person who violates a rule or order adopted by the county, district, or authority under this chapter is liable to the county, district, or authority for a civil penalty of not more than $1,000 for each violation. Each day a violation continues is considered a separate violation for purposes of assessing the civil penalty.

(b) A county, district, or authority may bring suit in a district court to:

(1) restrain a violation or threatened violation of a rule or order adopted by the county, district, or authority under this chapter; or

(2) recover a civil penalty authorized by Subsection (a).

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 245, Sec. 1, eff. May 28, 1999. Renumbered from Sec. 422.003 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(92), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Renumbered from Local Government Code, Section 423.003 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 3.76(c)(3), eff. April 1, 2009.